Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-304
Aggrieved person, defined.

Aggrieved person shall include any person who:

(1) Claims to have been injured by a discriminatory housing practice; or

(2) Believes that he or she will be injured by a discriminatory housing practice that is about to occur.

Laws 1991, LB 825, § 5.